Washington statutes.
RCW 10.04.040

Cash bail in lieu of recognizance.

District courts or committing magistrates may accept money as bail from persons charged with bailable offenses, and for the appearance of witnesses in all cases provided by law for the recognizance of witnesses. The amount of such bail or recognizance in each case shall be determined by the court in its discretion, and may from time to time be increased or decreased as circumstances may justify. The money to be received and accounted for in the same manner as provided by law for the superior courts.

[ 1987 c 202 s 150; 1919 c 76 s 1; RRS s 1957 1/2.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Excessive bail or fines, cruel punishment prohibited: State Constitution Art. 1 s 14.